Washington statutes.
RCW 2.12.046

Monthly benefit—Post-retirement adjustment—Computation.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, effective July 1, 1983, the monthly benefit of each person who either is receiving benefits pursuant to RCW 2.12.020 or 2.12.030 as of December 31, 1982, or commenced receiving a monthly benefit under this chapter as of a date no later than July 1, 1978, shall be permanently increased by a post-retirement adjustment of $.74 per month for each year of creditable service the judge established with the retirement system. Any fraction of a year of service shall be counted in the computation of the post-retirement adjustment. This adjustment shall be in lieu of any adjustments provided under RCW 2.12.037 as of July 1, 1983, or July 1, 1984, for the affected persons.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 56 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 56: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1983." [ 1983 1st ex.s. c 56 s 7.]